Missouri, session 2026, SB1647.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 324 and 331, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 324.263
and 331.084, to read as follows:
324.263. 1. The board may apply to the administrative
hearing commission for an emergency suspension or
restriction of a license issued under sections 324.240 to
324.275 if:
(1) The holder of the license is the subject of a
pending criminal indictment, criminal information, or other
criminal charge related to the duties and responsibilities
of the licensed occupation; and
(2) There is reasonable cause for the board to believe
that the public health, safety, or welfare is at imminent
risk of harm from the holder of the license.
2. The board shall submit to the administrative
hearing commission supporting affidavits and certified court
records, together with a complaint alleging the facts in
support of the board's request for an emergency suspension
or restriction of a license, and shall supply the
administrative hearing commission with the last home or

SB 1647 2
business addresses on file with the board for the licensee.
Within one business day of the filing of the complaint, the
administrative hearing commission shall return a service
packet to the board. The service packet shall include the
board's complaint and any affidavits or records the board
intends to rely on that have been filed with the
administrative hearing commission. The service packet may
contain other information in the discretion of the
administrative hearing commission. Within twenty-four hours
of receiving the packet, the board shall either personally
serve the licensee the service packet or leave a copy of the
service packet at all of the licensee's current addresses on
file with the board.
3. Within five days of the board's filing of the
complaint, the administrative hearing commission shall
review the information submitted by the board and shall
issue its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the
administrative hearing commission finds that there is
reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public
health, safety, or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from
the holder of the license, the administrative hearing
commission shall enter the order requested by the board.
The order shall be effective upon personal service or by
leaving a copy at all of the licensee's current addresses on
file with the board.
4. (1) The administrative hearing commission shall
hold an evidentiary hearing on the record within forty-five
days of the board's filing of the complaint, or upon final
adjudication of any criminal charges filed against the
licensee, as appropriate, to determine if cause for
discipline exists under the provisions of sections 324.240
to 324.275 and to determine whether the initial order

SB 1647 3
entered by the commission shall continue in effect. Prior
to the hearing, the licensee may file affidavits and
certified court records for consideration by the
administrative hearing commission. The administrative
hearing commission may grant a request for a continuance but
shall in any event hold the hearing within one hundred
twenty days of the board's initial filing. The board shall
be granted leave to amend its complaint if it is more than
thirty days prior to the hearing, or within thirty days
prior to the hearing upon a showing of good cause.
(2) If no cause for discipline is found following an
evidentiary hearing, the administrative hearing commission
shall issue findings of fact, conclusions of law, and an
order terminating the commission's initial order imposing an
emergency suspension or restriction of the license.
(3) If the administrative hearing commission finds
cause for discipline following an evidentiary hearing, the
commission shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of
law and order the emergency suspension or restriction to
remain in full force and effect pending a disciplinary
hearing before the board. The board shall hold a hearing
following the certification of the record by the
administrative hearing commission and may impose discipline
otherwise authorized by state law.
5. Any action under this section shall be in addition
to and not in lieu of any discipline otherwise in the
board's power to impose and may be brought concurrently with
other actions.
6. If the administrative hearing commission does not
grant an initial order imposing an emergency suspension or
restriction of the license as described in subsection 3 of

SB 1647 4
this section, the board shall remove all reference to such
emergency suspension or restriction from its public records.
331.084. 1. The board may apply to the administrative
hearing commission for an emergency suspension or
restriction of a license issued under this chapter if:
(1) The holder of the license is the subject of a
pending criminal indictment, criminal information, or other
criminal charge related to the duties and responsibilities
of the licensed occupation; and
(2) There is reasonable cause for the board to believe
that the public health, safety, or welfare is at imminent
risk of harm from the holder of the license.
2. The board shall submit to the administrative
hearing commission supporting affidavits and certified court
records, together with a complaint alleging the facts in
support of the board's request for an emergency suspension
or restriction of a license, and shall supply the
administrative hearing commission with the last home or
business addresses on file with the board for the licensee.
Within one business day of the filing of the complaint, the
administrative hearing commission shall return a service
packet to the board. The service packet shall include the
board's complaint and any affidavits or records the board
intends to rely on that have been filed with the
administrative hearing commission. The service packet may
contain other information in the discretion of the
administrative hearing commission. Within twenty-four hours
of receiving the packet, the board shall either personally
serve the licensee the service packet or leave a copy of the
service packet at all of the licensee's current addresses on
file with the board.

SB 1647 5
3. Within five days of the board's filing of the
complaint, the administrative hearing commission shall
review the information submitted by the board and shall
issue its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the
administrative hearing commission finds that there is
reasonable cause for the board to believe that the public
health, safety, or welfare is at imminent risk of harm from
the holder of the license, the administrative hearing
commission shall enter the order requested by the board.
The order shall be effective upon personal service or by
leaving a copy at all of the licensee's current addresses on
file with the board.
4. (1) The administrative hearing commission shall
hold an evidentiary hearing on the record within forty-five
days of the board's filing of the complaint, or upon final
adjudication of any criminal charges filed against the
licensee, as appropriate, to determine if cause for
discipline exists under the provisions of this chapter and
to determine whether the initial order entered by the
commission shall continue in effect. Prior to the hearing,
the licensee may file affidavits and certified court records
for consideration by the administrative hearing commission.
The administrative hearing commission may grant a request
for a continuance but shall in any event hold the hearing
within one hundred twenty days of the board's initial
filing. The board shall be granted leave to amend its
complaint if it is more than thirty days prior to the
hearing, or within thirty days prior to the hearing upon a
showing of good cause.
(2) If no cause for discipline is found following an
evidentiary hearing, the administrative hearing commission
shall issue findings of fact, conclusions of law, and an

SB 1647 6
order terminating the commission's initial order imposing an
emergency suspension or restriction of the license.
(3) If the administrative hearing commission finds
cause for discipline following an evidentiary hearing, the
commission shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of
law and order the emergency suspension or restriction to
remain in full force and effect pending a disciplinary
hearing before the board. The board shall hold a hearing
following the certification of the record by the
administrative hearing commission and may impose discipline
otherwise authorized by state law.
5. Any action under this section shall be in addition
to and not in lieu of any discipline otherwise in the
board's power to impose and may be brought concurrently with
other actions.
6. If the administrative hearing commission does not
grant an initial order imposing an emergency suspension or
restriction of the license as described in subsection 3 of
this section, the board shall remove all reference to such
emergency suspension or restriction from its public records.
✓